tr: Sis çıkış modu: Sürekli; Yüksek; Aralıklı; Düşük; Değişken; Diğer
es: Modo de salida de niebla: Continuo; Alto; Intermitente; Bajo; Variable; Otros
zh-TW: 霧化輸出模式: 不間斷; 高; 間歇性; 低; 可變; 其他
de: Nebelausgabemodus: Gleichbleibend; Hoch; Periodisch; Niedrig; Variabel; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Režim výstupu hmly: Nepretržitý; Vysoký; Prerušovaný; Nízky; Variabilný; Iné
hr-HR: Način izlaza magle: Kontinuirano; Visoki; Povremeno; Niski; Varijabilna; Ostalo
fr: Mode de diffusion de la brume: continu; Haute; Intermittent; Basse; Variable; Autre
lt-LT: Rūko išleidimo režimas: Nuolatinis; Aukštas; Pertraukiamas; Žemas; Keičiamas; Kita
pt-BR: Modo de saída de névoa: Contínuo; Alta; Intermitente; Baixa; Variável; Outro
pt-PT: Modo de saída de névoa: Contínuo; Alto; Intermitente; Baixo; Variável; Outro
sl-SI: Način odvoda megle: Neprekinjeno; Visok; Občasno; Nizek; Spremenljive; Druga
cs: Režim výstupu mlhy: Nepřetržitá produkce; Vysoká produkce; Přerušovaný; Nízká produkce; Variabilní; Jiné
ru: Режим подачи тумана: Непрерывный; Интенсивный; Прерывистый; Слабый; Регулируемый; Другое
en: Mist output mode: Continuous; High; Intermittent; Low; Variable; Other
it: Modalità di nebulizzazione: Continuo; Alto; Intermittente; Basso; Variabile; Altro
ja: ミスト出力モード: 連続; 高; 間欠; 低; 可変; その他
el: Λειτουργία εξόδου ομίχλης: Διαρκής; Υψηλή; Διαλείπων; Χαμηλή; Μεταβλητή; Άλλο
nb: Damputslippsmodus: Kontinuerlig; Høy; Intermitterende; Lav; Variabel; Annet
pl: Tryb wytwarzania mgiełki: Ciągłe; Wysokie; Tryb przerywany; Niskie; Zmienne; Pozostałe
ro-RO: Mode de emitere a ceții: Continuă; Ridicat; Intermitent; Scăzut; Variabil; Altele
vi: Chế độ phun sương: Liên tục; Cao; Ngắt quãng; Thấp; Thay đổi; Khác
zh-CN: 雾化输出默示: 连续; 高; 间歇性; 低; 可变; 其他
fi: Sumutustila: Jatkuva; Korkea; Ajoittainen; Matala; Muuttuva; Muu
sv: dimutsläppsläge: Kontinuerlig; Hög; Intermittent; Låg; Variabel; Övrigt
nl: Neveluitvoermodus: Continu; Hoog; Met tussenpozen; Laag; Variabel; Overig
ko: 미스트 분사 모드: 연속; 높음; 네스팅 구조; 낮음; 가변; 기타
hu: Köd kimeneti mód: Folyamatos; Magas; Időszakos; Alacsony; Átalakítható; Egyéb
da: Tågeudgangstilstand: Sammenhængende; Høj; Intermitterende; Lav; Variabel; Andet
bg-BG: Режим на отделяне на мъгла: Непрекъснато; Високо; Периодично; Ниско; Променливо; Друго
th: โหมดการพ่นหมอก: ต่อเนื่อง; สูง; โหมดพ่นไอเป็นจังหวะ; ต่ำ; ปรับได้; อื่นๆ